apertium-bkl.bkl.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for bkl

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>     ! Noun
%<prn%>   ! Pronoun
%<neg%>   ! Negation
%<resp%>  ! Response
%<psimp%> ! Pseudo-Imperatives
%<imp%>   ! Imperative marker
%<ij%>    ! Interjection
%<itg%>   ! Interogative
%<num%>   ! Numeral
%<adj%>   ! Adjective
%<adv%>   ! Adverb
%<man%>   ! Manner (subclass of Adverb)
%<locl%>  ! Locational
%<conj%>  ! Conjunction
%<post%>  ! Postposition
%<v%>     ! Verb
%<tv%>    ! Transitive Verb
%<iv%>    ! Intransitive Verb
%<part%>  ! Particle

! Number morphology
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular
%<du%>  ! Dual

! Cases
%<subj%>
%<ins%>
%<pos%>
%<com%>
%<dat%>
%<acc%>
%<relational%>
%<tv%>

! Tense
%<prs%>
%<pst%>
%<fut%>

! Pronouns
%<ref%>   ! Reflexive
%<dem%>   ! Demonstrative
%<part%>  ! Particular

! Modifiers
%<int%>  ! Intensifier
%<advl%> ! Adverbial

! Verb Morphology
%<lg%>
%<m%>
%<f%>
%<light%>   ! Action during the day (verbs)
%<dark%>  ! Action at night
%<low%>   ! Action down low
%<high%>  ! Action up high
%<dst%>   ! Action far away
%<prx%>   ! Action near

! Punctuation

%<sent%>
%<guio%>
%<cm%>
%<apos%>
%<lquot%>
%<rquot%>
%<lpar%>
%<rpar%>

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary
%{F%}   ! for commitative
%{S%}   ! for pronoun accusative
%{I%}   ! for variation in 1S pronoun
%{W%}   ! for postposition -wer (w deleted after nasals)
%{O%}
%{l%}
%{E%}
%{N%}
%{V%}
%{e%}
%{a%}

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

NounRoot ;
ClosedClass ;
PronounRoot ;
ModifierRoot ;
VerbRoot ;
GiveInflNum ;
TieInflNum ;
PlaceInflNum ;
Punctuation ;
UnknownVerbRoot ;

LEXICON RegNounInfl

! noun ends in vowel -> drop initial vowel of suffix (TODO)

%<n%>%<subj%>:na # ;
%<n%>+yan%<neg%>:yan # ;
%<n%>%<ins%>:%{e%}m # ;
%<n%>%<relational%>:bara # ;
%<n%>%<pos%>:em # ;
%<n%>%<pos%>:mana # ;
%<n%>%<com%>:far # ;
%<n%>%<dat%>:f # ;
%<n%>+ap%<post%>:%{a%}p # ;
%<n%>+wer%<post%>:%{W%}er # ;
%<n%>%<acc%>:s # ;
%<n%>:0 # ; ! grammar sketch says "However, not all nouns as Subject take this inflection.", assuming this means they take nothing

LEXICON PronounInfl

%<prn%>: PronounInfl-Case ;
%<prn%>%<subj%>: # ;

LEXICON PronounInfl-Case

%<acc%>:%{S%} # ;
%<dat%>:p # ;
%<com%>:bar # ;
%<acc%>%<ref%>:nan # ;
+yan%<neg%>:yan # ;
%<dem%>%<part%>:serem # ;
%<pos%>:mna # ; ! based on various example data
%<pos%>:mena # ;
%<pos%>:rem # ;
+ap%<post%>:%{a%}p # ;
+wer%<post%>:%{W%}er # ;

! the details of possesive pronouns are somewhat unclear (TODO)

LEXICON ModifierInfl
ModifierInfl-not-advl ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>:%{F%}er # ;

LEXICON ModifierInfl-not-advl

%<adj%>:0 # ;
%<adj%>%<int%>:sus # ;
%<adj%>+yan%<neg%>:yan # ;
%<adj%>:tena VerbInfl ;

! it's not explicit, but these suffixes probably apply to both adverbs and adjectives (TODO)
! double intensification is marked with full reduplication (waaken -> waaken-waakensus) (TODO)

LEXICON VerbInfl

# ;


LEXICON GiveInflNum
! currently only works for give, and only for the forms listed in the table in the grammar sketch
! could maybe be generalized (TODO)

gubana:g%{O%}%{l%} GiveInflNumSG ;
gubana:ter GiveInflNumDU ;
gubana:kit%{O%}%{l%} GiveInflNumPL ;
gubana%<v%>%<tv%>%<pl%>%<lg%>%<m%>%<fut%>:kitobafo # ;
gubana%<v%>%<tv%>%<du%>%<lg%>%<f%>%<prs%>%<dark%>:terbese # ;
gubana%<v%>%<tv%>%<du%>%<lg%>%<f%>%<pst%>%<dark%>:terbefint # ;

LEXICON GiveInflNumSG
%<v%>%<tv%>%<sg%>: GiveInflSize ;
LEXICON GiveInflNumDU
%<v%>%<tv%>%<du%>: GiveInflSize ;
LEXICON GiveInflNumPL
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pl%>: GiveInflSize ;

LEXICON GiveInflSize

%<lg%>:b GiveInflGender ;

LEXICON GiveInflGender

%<m%>:%{E%} GiveInflTense ;
%<f%>:i GiveInflTense ;

LEXICON GiveInflTense
OverlapTense ;
%<fut%>:f%{V%} # ;

LEXICON OverlapTense
%<pst%>%<dark%>:f%{V%}nt # ;
%<pst%>%<light%>:%{N%}%{V%}nt # ;
%<prs%>%<dark%>:s%{V%} # ;
%<prs%>%<light%>:%{N%}%{V%} # ;

LEXICON TieInflNum
! overlaps somewhat with the GiveInfl lexicons

fwirna:fwi TieInflNumSG ;
fwirna:faa TieInflNumDU ;
fwirna:tafe TieInflNumPL ;

LEXICON TieInflNumSG
%<v%>%<tv%>%<sg%>:re TieInflTense ;
LEXICON TieInflNumDU
%<v%>%<tv%>%<du%>:re TieInflTense ;
LEXICON TieInflNumPL
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pl%>:rebi TieInflTense ;

LEXICON TieInflTense
OverlapTense ;
%<fut%>%<dark%>:s%{V%} # ;
%<fut%>%<light%>:f%{V%} # ;
%<fut%>%<light%>:na # ;
%<pst%>%<light%>:fant # ;
%<pst%>%<dark%>:nant # ;
%<pst%>%<light%>:nant # ;

LEXICON PlaceInflNum
gwarantena%<v%>%<tv%>%<sg%>%<prs%>%<prx%>%<low%>:gwerantena # ;
gwarantena:gweran PlaceInflNumSG ;
gwarantena:toson PlaceInflNumDU ;
gwarantena:bunun PlaceInflNumPL ;

LEXICON PlaceInflNumSG
%<v%>%<tv%>%<sg%>%<prs%>: PlaceInflLoc ;
LEXICON PlaceInflNumDU
%<v%>%<tv%>%<du%>%<prs%>: PlaceInflLoc ;
LEXICON PlaceInflNumPL
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pl%>%<prs%>: PlaceInflLoc ;

LEXICON PlaceInflLoc
%<dst%>%<low%>:tetfa # ;
%<dst%>%<high%>:swetna # ;
%<prx%>%<low%>:tona # ;
%<prx%>%<high%>:sona # ;

LEXICON CryInfl
gwarenwena%<v%>%<tv%>%<sg%>%<prs%>:gwarenwena # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PronounRoot

! pronouns
ai:a%{I%} PronounInfl ; ! "I"
ne:ne PronounInfl ; ! "we"
i:i PronounInfl ; ! "you (SG)"
je:je PronounInfl ; ! "he, she, it"
je:jei PronounInfl ; ! "he, she, it"

! subject 1
! ai%<prn%>%<subj%>:ai PronounInfl ; ! "I (subj)"
i:aame PronounInfl ; ! "you (SG, subj)"
! je%<prn%>%<subj%>:je PronounInfl ; ! "he, she, it (subj)"
! ne%<prn%>%<subj%>:ne PronounInfl ; ! "we (subj)"

! subject 2
a:ajam PronounInfl ; ! "I (subj)"
i:ijam PronounInfl ; ! "you (SG, subj)"
je:jam PronounInfl ; ! "he, she, it (subj)"
ne:nejam PronounInfl ; ! "we (subj)"
! it might actually be "ne jam" (TODO)

LEXICON ModifierRoot

ane:ane ModifierInfl ; ! "many"
seyafter:seyafter ModifierInfl ; ! "all"
fas:fas ModifierInfl ; ! "none"
waakena:waakena ModifierInfl-not-advl ; ! "good"
waakena%<adj%>%<advl%>:waakenfer # ; ! "well"
kapka:kapka ModifierInfl ; ! "bad, damaged, mistake, erroneous, broken"
sasara:sasara ModifierInfl ; ! "happy"
baabeta:baabeta ModifierInfl ; ! "strong"
bunar:bunar ModifierInfl ; ! "true"
samem:samem ModifierInfl ; ! "slow"
taban:taban ModifierInfl ; ! "finished"
giri:giri ModifierInfl ; ! "deep, tall"
gwetmana:gwetmana ModifierInfl ; ! "near"
bijua:bijua ModifierInfl ; ! "far"
teten:teten ModifierInfl ; ! "empty"
enbisini:enbisini ModifierInfl ; ! "full"
kakala:kakala ModifierInfl ; ! "hot"
wisimi:wisimi ModifierInfl ; ! "cold"
kekelna:kekelna ModifierInfl ; ! "hard"
nonona:nonona ModifierInfl ; ! "soft"
titini:titini ModifierInfl ; ! "wet"
setera:setera ModifierInfl ; ! "dry"
unggwandusa:unggwandusa ModifierInfl ; ! "large"
bastantoiya:bastantoiya ModifierInfl-not-advl ; ! "small"
bastantoiya%<adj%>%<advl%>:bastantoifer # ; ! "a little (adv)"
bukona:bukona ModifierInfl ; ! "round"
ferfera:ferfera ModifierInfl ; ! "flat"
bubwalna:bubwalna ModifierInfl ; ! "long"
tofora:tofora ModifierInfl ; ! "short"
sinsini:sinsini ModifierInfl ; ! "white"
seseye:seseye ModifierInfl ; ! "black"
berbere:berbere ModifierInfl ; ! "red"
ikikini:ikikini ModifierInfl ; ! "green"
bwelkat-bwelkata:bwelkat-bwelkata ModifierInfl ; ! "yellow"
ibam-ibama:ibam-ibama ModifierInfl ; ! "blue"
unggunfena:unggunfena ModifierInfl ; ! "large"
setetina:setetina ModifierInfl ; ! "black"

LEXICON NounRoot
betik:betik RegNounInfl ; ! "mud"
bangge:bangge RegNounInfl ; ! "squirrel-fox"
sita:sita RegNounInfl ; ! "outside"
bwernabar:bwernabar RegNounInfl ; ! "sickness"
uwa:uwa RegNounInfl ; ! "father"
yafontoi:yafontoi RegNounInfl ; ! "daughter"
Mina:Mina RegNounInfl ; ! "(name)"
nan:nan RegNounInfl ; ! "who"
taman:taman RegNounInfl ; ! "village"
al:al RegNounInfl ; ! "armband"
anggwabura:anggwabura RegNounInfl ; ! "ethnic group, tribe"
ara:ara RegNounInfl ; ! "fig"
awas:awas RegNounInfl ; ! "snake"
ban:ban RegNounInfl ; ! "tire"
bis:bis RegNounInfl ; ! "bee, bus"
bwa:bwa RegNounInfl ; ! "lime"
bwat:bwat RegNounInfl ; ! "spirit"
dum:dum RegNounInfl ; ! "sago spoon/spatula"
ene:ene RegNounInfl ; ! "mother animal"
fen:fen RegNounInfl ; ! "clothing"
fo:fo RegNounInfl ; ! "lake, river, water"
fon:fon RegNounInfl ; ! "string bag"
giri:giri RegNounInfl ; ! "male animal"
gu:gu RegNounInfl ; ! "cassowary"
gwer:gwer RegNounInfl ; ! "sun"
igi:igi RegNounInfl ; ! "fruit, base of paddle"
iwil:iwil RegNounInfl ; ! "turtle, tortoise"
ja:ja RegNounInfl ; ! "house, building"
jam:jam RegNounInfl ; ! "clock, hour"
jigal:jigal RegNounInfl ; ! "fish"
kata:kata RegNounInfl ; ! "word"
malaikat:malaikat RegNounInfl ; ! "angel"
mif:mif RegNounInfl ; ! "lip"
mir:mir RegNounInfl ; ! "forehead"
mom:mom RegNounInfl ; ! "female breast"
mwar:mwar RegNounInfl ; ! "breadfruit"
naante:naante RegNounInfl ; ! "island"
naarem:naarem RegNounInfl ; ! "rudder, steering% wheel, paddle, oar"
nabal% fatar:nabal% fatar RegNounInfl ; ! "comb"
nabal% safa% sinsini:nabal% safa% sinsini RegNounInfl ; ! "grey% hair"
nabar% sir:nabar% sir RegNounInfl ; ! "crown"
nabi:nabi RegNounInfl ; ! "prophet"
nafa:nafa RegNounInfl ; ! "light"
nanas:nanas RegNounInfl ; ! "pineapple"
nanggala:nanggala RegNounInfl ; ! "tail"
nasi:nasi RegNounInfl ; ! "cooked% rice"
nat:nat RegNounInfl ; ! "sap"
negara:negara RegNounInfl ; ! "country"
nel:nel RegNounInfl ; ! "path, trail"
nin:nin RegNounInfl ; ! "flesh"
ninsar% ti:ninsar% ti RegNounInfl ; ! "milkwood% tree"
nogalfin:nogalfin RegNounInfl ; ! "handle"
nomor:nomor RegNounInfl ; ! "number"
nomor% ganjil:nomor% ganjil RegNounInfl ; ! "odd% number"
nornormer:nornormer RegNounInfl ; ! "row"
nue:nue RegNounInfl ; ! "eye"
nue% safa:nue% safa RegNounInfl ; ! "eyelash, eyebrow"
nuftiti:nuftiti RegNounInfl ; ! "fairy-tale"
nunggruf:nunggruf RegNounInfl ; ! "moss"
obat:obat RegNounInfl ; ! "medicine"
obeng:obeng RegNounInfl ; ! "screwdriver"
of:of RegNounInfl ; ! "worm"
ofo:ofo RegNounInfl ; ! "domesticated% pig"
ogulup:ogulup RegNounInfl ; ! "game"
akomwa:akomwa RegNounInfl ; ! "anus"
ol:ol RegNounInfl ; ! "tooth"
olbum:olbum RegNounInfl ; ! "cheek"
olele% safa:olele% safa RegNounInfl ; ! "beard"
olo:olo RegNounInfl ; ! "stinging% hairs"
oltu% sesan:oltu% sesan RegNounInfl ; ! "hay"
osasa:osasa RegNounInfl ; ! "drought"
aiya:aiya RegNounInfl ; ! "cousin"
otoma:otoma RegNounInfl ; ! "nail"
otum:otum RegNounInfl ; ! "hill"
pajak:pajak RegNounInfl ; ! "tax"
panci:panci RegNounInfl ; ! "pot"
pasar:pasar RegNounInfl ; ! "market"
pecahan:pecahan RegNounInfl ; ! "fraction"
pel:pel RegNounInfl ; ! "pill"
pemerintah:pemerintah RegNounInfl ; ! "government"
penanggalam:penanggalam RegNounInfl ; ! "calendar"
penginjil:penginjil RegNounInfl ; ! "evangelist"
pensil:pensil RegNounInfl ; ! "pencil"
perak:perak RegNounInfl ; ! "silver"
perjamuan% kudus:perjamuan% kudus RegNounInfl ; ! "Lord’s% Supper"
perunggu:perunggu RegNounInfl ; ! "bronze"
piala:piala RegNounInfl ; ! "cup"
piring:piring RegNounInfl ; ! "plate"
pos:pos RegNounInfl ; ! "mail"
udara:udara RegNounInfl ; ! "air"
propinsi:propinsi RegNounInfl ; ! "province"
agi:agi RegNounInfl ; ! "yeast"
raket:raket RegNounInfl ; ! "racket"
Roh% Kudus:Roh% Kudus RegNounInfl ; ! "Holy% Spirit"
roti:roti RegNounInfl ; ! "bread"
saaji:saaji RegNounInfl ; ! "stalk, stem"
onap:onap RegNounInfl ; ! "jungle"
Yusuf:Yusuf RegNounInfl ; ! "Joseph"
Abraham:Abraham RegNounInfl ; ! "Abraham"
Aminadab:Aminadab RegNounInfl ; ! ""
Babilon:Babilon RegNounInfl ; ! "Babylon"
Elyakim:Elyakim RegNounInfl ; ! ""
Hesron:Hesron RegNounInfl ; ! ""
Isak:Isak RegNounInfl ; ! "Isaac"
Matan:Matan RegNounInfl ; ! ""
Obet:Obet RegNounInfl ; ! "Obed"
Rahab:Rahab RegNounInfl ; ! "Rahab"
Sadok:Sadok RegNounInfl ; ! "Zadok"
Serubabel:Serubabel RegNounInfl ; ! ""
Urya:Urya RegNounInfl ; ! "Uriah"
Yekonya:Yekonya RegNounInfl ; ! ""
Yosya:Yosya RegNounInfl ; ! ""
